Massachusetts, session 194th, H2500.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4O the following section:-
Section 4P. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
"Authorized entity" means any entity or organization at which allergens capable of
causing anaphylaxis may be present, including, but not limited to, restaurants, recreation camps,
youth sports leagues, amusement parks, colleges, universities, and sports arenas.
"Epinephrine autoinjector" means a single-use device used for the automatic injection of
a premeasured dose of epinephrine into the human body
(b) An authorized entity may acquire and maintain a supply of epinephrine autoinjectors
from a wholesaler approved by the department pursuant to this section. All acquired epinephrine
of 3

autoinjectors shall be stored in a location readily accessible in an emergency and in accordance
with the epinephrine autoinjector's instructions for use. An authorized entity shall designate
employees or agents who have completed the training required by subsection (d) of this section
to be responsible for the storage, maintenance and general oversight of epinephrine autoinjectors
acquired under this section.
(c) An employee or agent of an authorized entity who has completed the training required
by subsection (d) of this section may, on the premises of or in connection with the authorized
entity, use epinephrine autoinjectors obtained under this section to provide or administer an
epinephrine autoinjector to any individual who the employee or agent believes in good faith is
experiencing anaphylaxis for immediate self-administration, regardless of whether the individual
has a prescription for an epinephrine autoinjector or has previously been diagnosed with an
allergy.
(d) An employee, agent, or other individual described in subsection (c) of this section
must complete an anaphylaxis training program prior to providing or administering an
epinephrine autoinjector made available by an authorized entity. The training must be conducted
by a nationally recognized organization experienced in training laypersons in emergency health
treatment or by an entity or individual approved by the department of public health. The entity
shall submit proof of training to the department and receive approval for the acquisition of
epinephrine autoinjectors.
(e) An authorized entity that possesses and makes available epinephrine autoinjectors and
its trained employees and agents shall not liable for any injuries or related damages that result
from the administration or self-administration of an epinephrine autoinjector, the failure to
of 3

administer an epinephrine autoinjector, or any other act or omission taken pursuant to this
section, provided that said immunity does not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross
negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
(f) An authorized entity that possesses and makes available epinephrine autoinjectors
shall submit to the department of public health, on a form developed by the department, a report
of each incident on the authorized entity's premises that involves the distribution or
administration of the authorized entity's epinephrine autoinjector. The department of public
health shall annually publish a report that summarizes and analyzes all reports submitted to it
under this subsection.
(g) The department shall promulgate guidance or regulations to carry out this section.
of 3